Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.360

Running start program—Enrollment in postsecondary institution—Determination of high school credits—Application toward graduation requirements.

A school district shall grant academic credit to a pupil enrolled in a course for high school credit if the pupil successfully completes the course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to award for the course. The determination shall be made in writing before the pupil enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence of the successful completion of each course in an institution of higher education shall be included in the pupil's secondary school records and transcript. The transcript shall also note that the course was taken at an institution of higher education.

[ 1994 c 205 s 7; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 407.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.